Missouri, session 2026, HB2411.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 143.1032, 226.925, 227.299, 301.020, and 302.171, RSMo, are
repealed and five new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 143.1032,
226.925, 227.299, 301.020, and 302.171, to read as follows:
143.1032. 1. In each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2022, each
individual or corporation entitled to a tax refund in an amount sufficient to make a
designation under this section may designate that one dollar or any amount in excess of one
dollar on a single return, and two dollars or any amount in excess of two dollars on a
combined return, of the refund due be credited to the Missouri [medal of honor] fallen heroes
fund. The contribution designation authorized by this section shall be clearly and
unambiguously printed on the first page of each income tax return form provided by this state.
If any individual or corporation that is not entitled to a tax refund in an amount sufficient to
make a designation under this section wishes to make a contribution to the Missouri [medal of
honor] fallen heroes fund, such individual or corporation may, by separate check, draft, or
other negotiable instrument, send in with the payment of taxes, or may send in separately, that
amount, clearly designated for the Missouri [medal of honor] fallen heroes fund, the
individual or corporation wishes to contribute. The department of revenue shall deposit such
amount to the Missouri [medal of honor] fallen heroes fund as provided in subsection 2 of
this section.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2411 2
2. The director of revenue shall deposit at least monthly all contributions designated
by individuals under this section to the state treasurer for deposit to the Missouri [medal of
honor] fallen heroes fund. The fund shall be administered by the director of revenue.
3. The director of revenue shall deposit at least monthly all contributions designated
by the corporations under this section, less an amount sufficient to cover the cost of
collection, handling, and administration by the department of revenue [during fiscal year
2021] not to exceed one percent, to the Missouri [medal of honor] fallen heroes fund.
4. A contribution designated under this section shall only be deposited in the Missouri
[medal of honor] fallen heroes fund after all other claims against the refund from which such
contribution is to be made have been satisfied.
5. Moneys deposited in the Missouri [medal of honor] fallen heroes fund shall be
used by the department of transportation to pay for the costs of [the Missouri medal of honor]
memorial signs.
6. The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as other
funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be credited to
the fund.
226.925. [1.] There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Missouri [Medal of
Honor Recipients] Fallen Heroes Fund". The fund shall consist of moneys donated pursuant
to sections 301.020, 302.171, and 143.1032. All moneys shall be received by the department
of revenue and either upon request or, at a minimum, on a monthly basis be transferred to the
department of transportation. Unexpended balances in the fund at the end of any fiscal year
shall not be transferred to the general revenue fund or any other fund, the provisions of
section 33.080 to the contrary notwithstanding. Moneys in the fund shall be used to pay [any
renewal fee for a memorial bridge or memorial highway signs for Missouri medal of honor
recipients] the costs associated with memorial designations for members of the Armed
Forces killed in the line of duty, members of the Armed Forces who are missing in
action, Missouri recipients of the medal of honor, emergency personnel killed while
performing duties relating to their employment, or state employees killed while serving
the state, and for the maintenance and repair of all such signs [whether originally paid for by
private donations or by the department of transportation.
2. The department of revenue shall provide notification by way of memorandum, to
the department of transportation informing the department of transportation of the payment
transfer to the credit of the state road fund, with the memorandum indicating the payment
amount, payment date, payment account number, and the names or names of the Missouri
medal of honor recipient or recipients for which the payment is made] as required by section
227.296.

HB 2411 3
227.299. 1. Except as provided in subsection 7 of this section, an organization or
person that seeks a bridge or highway designation on the state highway system to honor an
event, place, organization, or person [who has been deceased for more than two years] shall
petition the department of transportation by submitting the following:
(1) An application in a form prescribed by the director, describing the bridge or
segment of highway for which designation is sought and the proposed name of the bridge or
relevant portion of highway. The application shall include the name of at least one current
member of the general assembly who will sponsor the bridge or highway designation. The
application may contain written testimony for support of the bridge or highway designation;
and
(2) [A list of at least one hundred signatures of individuals who support the naming of
the bridge or highway; and
(3)] A fee to be determined by the commission, not to exceed the cost of the materials
needed to construct each sign.
2. All moneys received by the department of transportation for the construction of
bridge or highway signs on the state highway system shall be deposited in the state treasury to
the credit of the state road fund.
3. The documents and fees required under this section shall be submitted to the
department of transportation no later than November first prior to the next regular session of
the general assembly to be approved or denied by the joint committee on transportation
oversight during such legislative session.
4. The department of transportation shall give notice of any proposed bridge or
highway designation on the state highway system in a manner reasonably calculated to advise
the public of such proposal. Reasonable notice shall include posting the proposal for the
designation on the department's official public website, and making available copies of the
sign designation application to any representative of the news media or public upon request
and posting the application on a bulletin board or other prominent public place which is easily
accessible to the public and clearly designated for that purpose at the principal office.
5. If the memorial highway designation requested by the organization is not approved
by the joint committee on transportation oversight, ninety-seven percent of the application fee
shall be refunded to the requesting organization.
6. Two highway signs shall be erected for each bridge and highway designation on
the state highway system processed under this section. When a named section of a highway
crosses two or more county lines, consideration shall be given by the department of
transportation to allow additional signage at the county lines or major intersections.
7. Highway or bridge designations on the state highway system honoring fallen law
enforcement officers, members of the Armed Forces killed in the line of duty, Missouri

HB 2411 4
recipients of the medal of honor, emergency personnel killed while performing duties relating
to their employment, or state employees killed while serving the state shall not be subject to
the provisions of [subdivisions] subdivision (2) [and (3)] of subsection 1 of this section.
8. No bridge or portion of a highway on the state highway system may be named or
designated after more than one event, place, organization, or person. Each event, place,
organization, or person shall only be eligible for one bridge or highway designation.
9. Any highway signs erected for any bridge or highway designation on the state
highway system under the provisions of this section shall be erected and maintained for a
twenty-year period. After such period, the signs shall be subject to removal by the
department of transportation and the bridge or highway may be designated to honor events,
places, organizations, or persons other than the current designee. An existing highway or
bridge designation processed under the provisions of this section may be retained for
additional twenty-year increments if, at least one year before the designation's expiration, an
application to the department of transportation is made to retain the designation along with
the required documents and all applicable fees required under this section.
10. For persons honored with designations on the state highway system under this
chapter after August 28, 2021, the department of transportation shall post a link on its website
to biographical information of such persons.
11. The provisions of this section shall apply to bridge or highway designations
sought after August 28, 2006.
301.020. 1. Every owner of a motor vehicle or trailer, which shall be operated or
driven upon the highways of this state, except as herein otherwise expressly provided, shall
annually file, by mail or otherwise, in the office of the director of revenue, an application for
registration on a blank to be furnished by the director of revenue for that purpose containing:
(1) A brief description of the motor vehicle or trailer to be registered, including the
name of the manufacturer, the vehicle identification number, the amount of motive power of
the motor vehicle, stated in figures of horsepower and whether the motor vehicle is to be
registered as a motor vehicle primarily for business use as defined in section 301.010;
(2) The name, the applicant's identification number and address of the owner of such
motor vehicle or trailer;
(3) The gross weight of the vehicle and the desired load in pounds if the vehicle is a
commercial motor vehicle or trailer.
2. If the vehicle is a motor vehicle primarily for business use as defined in section
301.010 and if such vehicle is ten years of age or less and has less than one hundred fifty
thousand miles on the odometer, the director of revenue shall retain the odometer information
provided in the vehicle inspection report, and provide for prompt access to such information,
together with the vehicle identification number for the motor vehicle to which such

HB 2411 5
information pertains, for a period of ten years after the receipt of such information. This
section shall not apply unless:
(1) The application for the vehicle's certificate of ownership was submitted after July
1, 1989; and
(2) The certificate was issued pursuant to a manufacturer's statement of origin.
3. If the vehicle is any motor vehicle other than a motor vehicle primarily for business
use, a recreational motor vehicle, motorcycle, motortricycle, autocycle, bus, or any
commercial motor vehicle licensed for over twelve thousand pounds and if such motor
vehicle is ten years of age or less and has less than one hundred fifty thousand miles on the
odometer, the director of revenue shall retain the odometer information provided in the
vehicle inspection report, and provide for prompt access to such information, together with
the vehicle identification number for the motor vehicle to which such information pertains,
for a period of ten years after the receipt of such information. This subsection shall not apply
unless:
(1) The application for the vehicle's certificate of ownership was submitted after July
1, 1990; and
(2) The certificate was issued pursuant to a manufacturer's statement of origin.
4. If the vehicle qualifies as a reconstructed motor vehicle, motor change vehicle,
specially constructed motor vehicle, non-USA-std motor vehicle, as defined in section
301.010, or prior salvage as referenced in section 301.573, the owner or lienholder shall
surrender the certificate of ownership. The owner shall make an application for a new
certificate of ownership, pay the required title fee, and obtain the vehicle examination
certificate required pursuant to subsection 9 of section 301.190. If an insurance company
pays a claim on a salvage vehicle as defined in section 301.010 and the owner retains the
vehicle, as prior salvage, the vehicle shall only be required to meet the examination
requirements under subsection 10 of section 301.190. Notarized bills of sale along with a
copy of the front and back of the certificate of ownership for all major component parts
installed on the vehicle and invoices for all essential parts which are not defined as major
component parts shall accompany the application for a new certificate of ownership. If the
vehicle is a specially constructed motor vehicle, as defined in section 301.010, two pictures of
the vehicle shall be submitted with the application. If the vehicle is a kit vehicle, the
applicant shall submit the invoice and the manufacturer's statement of origin on the kit. If the
vehicle requires the issuance of a special number by the director of revenue or a replacement
vehicle identification number, the applicant shall submit the required application and
application fee. All applications required under this subsection shall be submitted with any
applicable taxes which may be due on the purchase of the vehicle or parts. The director of
revenue shall appropriately designate "Reconstructed Motor Vehicle", "Motor Change

HB 2411 6
Vehicle", "Non-USA-Std Motor Vehicle", or "Specially Constructed Motor Vehicle" on the
current and all subsequent issues of the certificate of ownership of such vehicle.
5. Every insurance company that pays a claim for repair of a motor vehicle which as
the result of such repairs becomes a reconstructed motor vehicle as defined in section 301.010
or that pays a claim on a salvage vehicle as defined in section 301.010 and the owner is
retaining the vehicle shall in writing notify the owner of the vehicle, and in a first party claim,
the lienholder if a lien is in effect, that he is required to surrender the certificate of ownership,
and the documents and fees required pursuant to subsection 4 of this section to obtain a prior
salvage motor vehicle certificate of ownership or documents and fees as otherwise required
by law to obtain a salvage certificate of ownership, from the director of revenue. The
insurance company shall within thirty days of the payment of such claims report to the
director of revenue the name and address of such owner, the year, make, model, vehicle
identification number, and license plate number of the vehicle, and the date of loss and
payment.
6. Anyone who fails to comply with the requirements of this section shall be guilty of
a class B misdemeanor.
7. An applicant for registration may make a donation of one dollar to promote a
blindness education, screening and treatment program. The director of revenue shall collect
the donations and deposit all such donations in the state treasury to the credit of the blindness
education, screening and treatment program fund established in section 209.015. Moneys in
the blindness education, screening and treatment program fund shall be used solely for the
purposes established in section 209.015; except that the department of revenue shall retain no
more than one percent for its administrative costs. The donation prescribed in this subsection
is voluntary and may be refused by the applicant for registration at the time of issuance or
renewal. The director shall inquire of each applicant at the time the applicant presents the
completed application to the director whether the applicant is interested in making the one
dollar donation prescribed in this subsection.
8. An applicant for registration may make a donation of an amount not less than one
dollar to promote an organ donor program. The director of revenue shall collect the donations
and deposit all such donations in the state treasury to the credit of the organ donor program
fund as established in sections 194.297 to 194.304. Moneys in the organ donor fund shall be
used solely for the purposes established in sections 194.297 to 194.304, except that the
department of revenue shall retain no more than one percent for its administrative costs. The
donation prescribed in this subsection is voluntary and may be refused by the applicant for
registration at the time of issuance or renewal. The director shall inquire of each applicant at
the time the applicant presents the completed application to the director whether the applicant
is interested in making a contribution not less than one dollar as prescribed in this subsection.

HB 2411 7
9. An applicant for registration may make a donation of one dollar to the Missouri
[medal of honor recipients] fallen heroes fund. The director of revenue shall collect the
donations and deposit all such donations in the state treasury to the credit of the Missouri
[medal of honor recipients] fallen heroes fund as established in section 226.925. Moneys in
the [medal of honor recipients] Missouri fallen heroes fund shall be used solely for the
purposes established in section 226.925, except that the department of revenue shall retain no
more than one percent for its administrative costs. The donation prescribed in this subsection
is voluntary and may be refused by the applicant for registration at the time of issuance or
100 renewal. The director shall inquire of each applicant at the time the applicant presents the
101 completed application to the director whether the applicant is interested in making the one
102 dollar donation prescribed in this subsection.
302.171. 1. The director shall verify that an applicant for a driver's license is a
Missouri resident or national of the United States or a noncitizen with a lawful immigration
status, and a Missouri resident before accepting the application. The director shall not issue a
driver's license for a period that exceeds the duration of an applicant's lawful immigration
status in the United States. The director may establish procedures to verify the Missouri
residency or United States naturalization or lawful immigration status and Missouri residency
of the applicant and establish the duration of any driver's license issued under this section. An
application for a license shall be made upon an approved form furnished by the director.
Every application shall state the full name, Social Security number, age, height, weight, color
of eyes, sex, residence, mailing address of the applicant, and the classification for which the
applicant has been licensed, and, if so, when and by what state, and whether or not such
license has ever been suspended, revoked, or disqualified, and, if revoked, suspended or
disqualified, the date and reason for such suspension, revocation or disqualification and
whether the applicant is making a one or more dollar donation to promote an organ donation
program as prescribed in subsection 2 of this section, to promote a blindness education,
screening and treatment program as prescribed in subsection 3 of this section, or the Missouri
medal of honor recipients fund prescribed in subsection 4 of this section. A driver's license,
nondriver's license, or instruction permit issued under this chapter shall contain the applicant's
legal name as it appears on a birth certificate or as legally changed through marriage or court
order. No name change by common usage based on common law shall be permitted. The
application shall also contain such information as the director may require to enable the
director to determine the applicant's qualification for driving a motor vehicle; and shall state
whether or not the applicant has been convicted in this or any other state for violating the laws
of this or any other state or any ordinance of any municipality, relating to driving without a
license, careless driving, or driving while intoxicated, or failing to stop after an accident and
disclosing the applicant's identity, or driving a motor vehicle without the owner's consent.

HB 2411 8
The application shall contain a certification by the applicant as to the truth of the facts stated
therein. Every person who applies for a license to operate a motor vehicle who is less than
twenty-one years of age shall be provided with educational materials relating to the hazards of
driving while intoxicated, including information on penalties imposed by law for violation of
the intoxication-related offenses of the state. Beginning January 1, 2001, if the applicant is
less than eighteen years of age, the applicant must comply with all requirements for the
issuance of an intermediate driver's license pursuant to section 302.178. For persons
mobilized and deployed with the United States Armed Forces, an application under this
subsection shall be considered satisfactory by the department of revenue if it is signed by a
person who holds general power of attorney executed by the person deployed, provided the
applicant meets all other requirements set by the director.
2. An applicant for a license may make a donation of an amount not less than one
dollar to promote an organ donor program. The director of revenue shall collect the donations
and deposit all such donations in the state treasury to the credit of the organ donor program
fund established in sections 194.297 to 194.304. Moneys in the organ donor program fund
shall be used solely for the purposes established in sections 194.297 to 194.304 except that
the department of revenue shall retain no more than one percent for its administrative costs.
The donation prescribed in this subsection is voluntary and may be refused by the applicant
for the license at the time of issuance or renewal of the license. The director shall make
available an informational booklet or other informational sources on the importance of organ
and tissue donations to applicants for licensure as designed by the organ donation advisory
committee established in sections 194.297 to 194.304. The director shall inquire of each
applicant at the time the licensee presents the completed application to the director whether
the applicant is interested in making the one or more dollar donation prescribed in this
subsection and whether the applicant is interested in inclusion in the organ donor registry and
shall also specifically inform the licensee of the ability to consent to organ donation by
placing a donor symbol sticker authorized and issued by the department of health and senior
services on the back of his or her driver's license or identification card as prescribed by
subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of section 194.225. A symbol may be placed on the front of
the license or identification card indicating the applicant's desire to be listed in the registry at
the applicant's request at the time of his or her application for a driver's license or
identification card, or the applicant may instead request an organ donor sticker from the
department of health and senior services by application on the department of health and senior
services' website. Upon receipt of an organ donor sticker sent by the department of health and
senior services, the applicant shall place the sticker on the back of his or her driver's license or
identification card to indicate that he or she has made an anatomical gift. The director shall
notify the department of health and senior services of information obtained from applicants

HB 2411 9
who indicate to the director that they are interested in registry participation, and the
department of health and senior services shall enter the complete name, address, date of birth,
race, gender and a unique personal identifier in the registry established in subsection 1 of
section 194.304.
3. An applicant for a license may make a donation of one dollar to promote a
blindness education, screening and treatment program. The director of revenue shall collect
the donations and deposit all such donations in the state treasury to the credit of the blindness
education, screening and treatment program fund established in section 209.015. Moneys in
the blindness education, screening and treatment program fund shall be used solely for the
purposes established in section 209.015; except that the department of revenue shall retain no
more than one percent for its administrative costs. The donation prescribed in this subsection
is voluntary and may be refused by the applicant for the license at the time of issuance or
renewal of the license. The director shall inquire of each applicant at the time the licensee
presents the completed application to the director whether the applicant is interested in
making the one dollar donation prescribed in this subsection.
4. An applicant for registration may make a donation of one dollar to the Missouri
[medal of honor recipients] fallen heroes fund. The director of revenue shall collect the
donations and deposit all such donations in the state treasury to the credit of the Missouri
[medal of honor recipients] fallen heroes fund as established in section 226.925. Moneys in
the [medal of honor recipients] Missouri fallen heroes fund shall be used solely for the
purposes established in section 226.925, except that the department of revenue shall retain no
more than one percent for its administrative costs. The donation prescribed in this subsection
is voluntary and may be refused by the applicant for registration at the time of issuance or
renewal. The director shall inquire of each applicant at the time the applicant presents the
completed application to the director whether the applicant is interested in making the one
dollar donation prescribed in this subsection.
5. Beginning July 1, 2005, the director shall deny the driving privilege of any person
who commits fraud or deception during the examination process or who makes application
for an instruction permit, driver's license, or nondriver's license which contains or is
substantiated with false or fraudulent information or documentation, or who knowingly
conceals a material fact or otherwise commits a fraud in any such application. The period of
denial shall be one year from the effective date of the denial notice sent by the director. The
denial shall become effective ten days after the date the denial notice is mailed to the person.
The notice shall be mailed to the person at the last known address shown on the person's
driving record. The notice shall be deemed received three days after mailing unless returned
by the postal authorities. No such individual shall reapply for a driver's examination,
100 instruction permit, driver's license, or nondriver's license until the period of denial is

HB 2411 10
101 completed. No individual who is denied the driving privilege under this section shall be
102 eligible for a limited driving privilege issued under section 302.309.
103 6. All appeals of denials under this section shall be made as required by section
104 302.311.
105 7. The period of limitation for criminal prosecution under this section shall be
106 extended under subdivision (1) of subsection 3 of section 556.036.
107 8. The director may promulgate rules and regulations necessary to administer and
108 enforce this section. No rule or portion of a rule promulgated pursuant to the authority of this
109 section shall become effective unless it has been promulgated pursuant to chapter 536.
110 9. Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter that requires an applicant to provide
111 proof of Missouri residency for renewal of a noncommercial driver's license, noncommercial
112 instruction permit, or nondriver's license, an applicant who is sixty-five years and older and
113 who was previously issued a Missouri noncommercial driver's license, noncommercial
114 instruction permit, or Missouri nondriver's license is exempt from showing proof of Missouri
115 residency.
116 10. Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter, for the renewal of a
117 noncommercial driver's license, noncommercial instruction permit, or nondriver's license, a
118 photocopy of an applicant's United States birth certificate along with another form of
119 identification approved by the department of revenue, including, but not limited to, United
120 States military identification or United States military discharge papers, shall constitute
121 sufficient proof of Missouri citizenship.
122 11. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, if an applicant does not meet
123 the requirements of subsection 9 of this section and does not have the required documents to
124 prove Missouri residency, United States naturalization, or lawful immigration status, the
125 department may issue a one-year driver's license renewal. This one-time renewal shall only
126 be issued to an applicant who previously has held a Missouri noncommercial driver's license,
127 noncommercial instruction permit, or nondriver's license for a period of fifteen years or more
128 and who does not have the required documents to prove Missouri residency, United States
129 naturalization, or lawful immigration status. After the expiration of the one-year period, no
130 further renewal shall be provided without the applicant producing proof of Missouri
131 residency, United States naturalization, or lawful immigration status.
✔